Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-512.09
Garnishment for collection of child support or medical support; where filed.

A garnishment for the collection of child support or medical support may be filed in any jurisdiction where any property or credits of the defendant may be found irrespective of the residence of the creditors or the place where the debt is payable.

Laws 1976, LB 926, § 11;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 13.